Washington statutes.
RCW 33.36.010

Illegal loans or investments.

Any director, officer, agent, or employee of an association who, on behalf of such association, shall knowingly and wilfully make or participate in making or consent to any loan or investment contrary to the provisions of this title shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1945 c 235 s 87; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-206. Prior: 1933 c 183 ss 53, 62, 102, 111; 1919 c 169 s 16; 1913 c 110 s 27.]